Maine, session 132, LD1362.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA c. 1605 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 1605
SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS IN RECOVERY FROM SUBSTANCE USE
DISORDER
§7281. Funding parity for peer-run recovery centers and recovery community
centers
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Peer-run recovery center" means a center operated and governed by individuals in
recovery from substance use disorder that provides peer-led support, education and
recovery services.
B. "Recovery community center" means a center that provides support and resources
for individuals in recovery from substance use disorder and that provides support and
resources for families and community members of individuals in recovery, but is not
necessarily governed by individuals in recovery.
2. Funding parity requirement. The department shall ensure that funding for peer-
run recovery centers and recovery community centers is maintained within a 10% margin
of parity. Parity must be calculated based on the total state funds provided to peer-run
recovery centers and recovery community centers in a fiscal year. The funding difference
between the 2 categories of recovery centers may not exceed 10% of the total state funds
provided to the category of recovery center that is the beneficiary of fewer funds.
3. Annual reporting and compliance. The department shall submit an annual report
to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health and
human services matters no later than February 15th detailing funding provided for peer-run
recovery centers and recovery community centers. The report must include:
A. The total amount of state funds provided to each category of recovery center in the
preceding fiscal year;
B. A calculation of the funding parity margin; and
C. An explanation for any variance exceeding the 10% threshold described in
subsection 2 and a plan to achieve compliance in the subsequent fiscal year.
4. Rules. The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as described in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.